Wisconsin, session 2025, AB230.
do enact as follows:AB230,13Section 1. 100.76 of the statutes is created to read:AB230,2,84100.76 Retail sellers required to accept cash. A person who sells goods or 5services at retail from a physical location shall accept cash in exchange for those 6goods or services during a face-to-face sale with a consumer at one or more points of 1sale at the physical location, unless the person is otherwise prohibited by law from 2accepting cash for the goods or services being sold. The department, or any district 3attorney upon notifying the department, may commence an action in the name of 4the state to recover a forfeiture to the state of not less than $200 and not more than 5$5,000 for each violation of this section. In lieu of or in addition to a forfeiture, the 6department, or any district attorney upon notifying the department, may seek a 7temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating this 8section.AB230,2,99